Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-629
Curbs and gutters; authorized; petition; formation of district; bonds.

In a city of the first class, curbing and guttering shall not be required or ordered to be laid on any street, avenue or alley not ordered to be paved, repaved, graveled or macadamized, except on a petition of the owners of two-thirds of the front footage of property abutting along the line of that portion of the street, avenue or alley which is to be curbed or guttered.

When such petition is presented, a curbing and guttering district shall be formed, which district shall be governed by the provisions of section 16-630. Any bonds issued on account of such district shall be known as Bonds of Curbing and Guttering District No. ........ .

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, LV, p. 259;

Laws 1901, c. 19, § 4, p. 307;

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4924;

C.S.1922, § 4092;

Laws 1925, c. 50, § 6, p. 196;

C.S.1929, § 16-621;

R.S.1943, § 16-629;

Laws 1965, c. 56, § 1, p. 263;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 42.